Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 5. Prescription Drug Cost Containment

§ 1997.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” or “Drug Utilization Review Board” means the Drug Utilization Review Board established in connection with the Medicaid program.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access.

“Health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan with prescription drug coverage offered or administered by a health insurer, as defined by

18 V.S.A. § 9402

, and the out-of-state counterparts to such plans. The term includes:

any State public assistance program with a health benefit plan that provides coverage of prescription drugs;

any health benefit plan offered by or on behalf of the State of Vermont or any instrumentality of the State providing coverage for government employees and their dependents that agrees to participate in the Program; and

any insured or self-insured health benefit plan that agrees to participate in the Program.

“Department” means the Department of Vermont Health Access.

“Participating health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that has agreed to participate in one or more components of the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program.

“Program” or “the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program” means the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program established by this subchapter.

“State public assistance program” includes the Medicaid program, VPharm, the State Children’s Health Insurance Program, the State of Vermont AIDS Medication Assistance Program, the General Assistance program, the Pharmacy Discount Plan Program, and the out-of-state counterparts to such programs.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 100;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.61;

2013, No. 79

, § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 1998.
Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program established.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall establish and maintain a Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program designed to reduce the cost of providing prescription drugs, while maintaining high quality in prescription drug therapies. The Program shall include:

use of an evidence-based preferred list of covered prescription drugs that identifies preferred choices within therapeutic classes for particular diseases and conditions, including generic alternatives and over-the-counter drugs;

utilization review procedures, including a prior authorization review process;

any strategy designed to negotiate with pharmaceutical manufacturers to lower the cost of prescription drugs for Program participants, including a supplemental rebate program;

alternative pricing mechanisms, including consideration of using maximum allowable cost pricing for generic and other prescription drugs;

alternative coverage terms, including consideration of providing coverage of over-the-counter drugs where cost-effective in comparison to prescription drugs, and authorizing coverage of dosages capable of permitting the consumer to split each pill if cost-effective and medically appropriate for the consumer;

a simple, uniform prescription form, designed to implement the preferred drug list, and to enable prescribers and consumers to request an exception to the preferred drug list choice with a minimum of cost and time to prescribers, pharmacists, and consumers;

a joint pharmaceuticals purchasing consortium as provided for in subdivision (c)(1) of this section; and

any other cost containment activity adopted, by rule, by the Commissioner that is designed to reduce the cost of providing prescription drugs while maintaining high quality in prescription drug therapies.

The Commissioner shall implement the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program for Medicaid and all other State public assistance program health benefit plans to the extent permitted by federal law.

The Commissioner may implement the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program for any other health benefit plan within or outside this State that agrees to participate in the Program. For entities in Vermont, the Commissioner shall directly or by contract implement the Program through a joint pharmaceuticals purchasing consortium. The joint pharmaceuticals purchasing consortium shall be offered on a voluntary basis no later than January 1, 2008, with mandatory participation by State or publicly funded, administered, or subsidized purchasers to the extent practicable and consistent with the purposes of this chapter, by January 1, 2010. If necessary, the Department of Vermont Health Access shall seek authorization from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid to include purchases funded by Medicaid. “State or publicly funded purchasers” shall include the Department of Corrections, the Department of Mental Health, Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, VPharm, Healthy Vermonters, workers’ compensation, and any other State or publicly funded purchaser of prescription drugs.
(c) (1) The Commissioner may implement the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program for any other health benefit plan within or outside this State that agrees to participate in the Program. For entities in Vermont, the Commissioner shall directly or by contract implement the Program through a joint pharmaceuticals purchasing consortium. The joint pharmaceuticals purchasing consortium shall be offered on a voluntary basis no later than January 1, 2008, with mandatory participation by State or publicly funded, administered, or subsidized purchasers to the extent practicable and consistent with the purposes of this chapter, by January 1, 2010. If necessary, the Department of Vermont Health Access shall seek authorization from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid to include purchases funded by Medicaid. “State or publicly funded purchasers” shall include the Department of Corrections, the Department of Mental Health, Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, VPharm, Healthy Vermonters, workers’ compensation, and any other State or publicly funded purchaser of prescription drugs.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access and the Secretary of Administration shall take all steps necessary to enable Vermont’s participation in joint prescription drug purchasing agreements with any other health benefit plan or organization within or outside this State that agrees to participate with Vermont in such joint purchasing agreements.

The Commissioner of Human Resources shall take all steps necessary to enable the State of Vermont to participate in joint prescription drug purchasing agreements with any other health benefit plan or organization within or outside this State that agrees to participate in such joint purchasing agreements, as may be agreed to through the bargaining process between the State of Vermont and the authorized representatives of the employees of the State of Vermont.

The actions of the Commissioners and the Secretary shall include:

active collaboration with the National Legislative Association on Prescription Drug Prices;

active collaboration with the Pharmacy RFP Issuing States initiative organized by the West Virginia Public Employees Insurance Agency;

the execution of any joint purchasing agreements or other contracts with any participating health benefit plan or organization within or outside the State that the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access determines will lower the cost of prescription drugs for Vermonters while maintaining high quality in prescription drug therapies; and

with regard to participation by the State Employees Health Benefit Plan, the execution of any joint purchasing agreements or other contracts with any health benefit plan or organization within or outside the State that the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access determines will lower the cost of prescription drugs and provide overall quality of integrated health care services to the State Employees Health Benefit Plan and the beneficiaries of the Plan, and that is negotiated through the bargaining process between the State of Vermont and the authorized representatives of the employees of the State of Vermont.

The Commissioners of Human Resources and of Vermont Health Access may renegotiate and amend existing contracts to which the Departments of Vermont Health Access and of Human Resources are parties if such renegotiation and amendment will be of economic benefit to the health benefit plans subject to such contracts, and to the beneficiaries of such plans. Any renegotiated or substituted contract shall be designed to improve the overall quality of integrated health care services provided to beneficiaries of such plans.

[Repealed.]

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access, the Commissioner of Human Resources, the Commissioner of Financial Regulation, and the Secretary of Human Services shall establish a collaborative process with the Vermont Medical Society, pharmacists, health insurers, consumers, employer organizations and other health benefit plan sponsors, the National Legislative Association on Prescription Drug Prices, pharmaceutical manufacturer organizations, and other interested parties designed to consider and make recommendations to reduce the cost of prescription drugs for all Vermonters.

A participating health benefit plan other than a State public assistance program may agree with the Commissioner to limit the plan’s participation to one or more program components. The Commissioner shall supervise the implementation and operation of the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program, including developing and maintaining the preferred drug list, to carry out the provisions of the subchapter. The Commissioner may include such insured or self-insured health benefit plans as agree to use the preferred drug list or otherwise participate in the provisions of this subchapter. The purpose of this subchapter is to reduce the cost of providing prescription drugs while maintaining high quality in prescription drug therapies.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall develop procedures for the coordination of State public assistance program health benefit plan benefits with pharmaceutical manufacturer patient assistance programs offering free or low cost prescription drugs, including the development of a proposed single application form for such programs. The Commissioner may contract with a nongovernmental organization to develop the single application form.

The Drug Utilization Review Board shall make recommendations to the Commissioner for the adoption of the preferred drug list. The Board’s recommendations shall be based upon evidence-based considerations of clinical efficacy, adverse side effects, safety, appropriate clinical trials, and cost-effectiveness. “Evidence-based” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 4621

. The Commissioner shall provide the Board with evidence-based information about clinical efficacy, adverse side effects, safety, and appropriate clinical trials and shall provide information about cost-effectiveness of available drugs in the same therapeutic class.
(f) (1) The Drug Utilization Review Board shall make recommendations to the Commissioner for the adoption of the preferred drug list. The Board’s recommendations shall be based upon evidence-based considerations of clinical efficacy, adverse side effects, safety, appropriate clinical trials, and cost-effectiveness. “Evidence-based” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 4621

. The Commissioner shall provide the Board with evidence-based information about clinical efficacy, adverse side effects, safety, and appropriate clinical trials and shall provide information about cost-effectiveness of available drugs in the same therapeutic class.

The Board shall meet at least quarterly. The Board shall comply with the requirements of 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2 (Open Meeting Law) and 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 (Public Records Act), except that the Board may go into executive session to discuss drug alternatives and receive information on the relative price, net of any rebates, of a drug under discussion and the drug price in comparison to the prices, net of any rebates, of alternative drugs available in the same class to determine cost-effectiveness, and in order to comply with subsection 2002(c) of this title to consider information relating to a pharmaceutical rebate or to supplemental rebate agreements, which are protected from disclosure by federal law or the terms and conditions required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a condition of rebate authorization under the Medicaid program.

To the extent feasible, the Board shall review all drug classes included in the preferred drug list at least every 24 months and may recommend that the Commissioner make additions to or deletions from the preferred drug list.

The Program shall establish Board procedures for the timely review of prescription drugs newly approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, including procedures for the review of newly approved prescription drugs in emergency circumstances.

Members of the Board shall receive per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 1010

.

The Commissioner shall encourage participation in the joint purchasing consortium by inviting representatives of the programs and entities specified in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to participate as observers or nonvoting members in the Drug Utilization Review Board and by inviting the representatives to use the preferred drug list in connection with the plans’ prescription drug coverage.

The Department shall seek assistance from entities conducting independent research into the effectiveness of prescription drugs to provide technical and clinical support in the development and the administration of the preferred drug list and the evidence-based education program established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 2.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 128f;

2003, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 71

, § 308;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 101;

2007, No. 80

, §§ 1a, 2;

2009, No. 59

, § 9;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.309.2;

2009, No. 1

56

(Adj. Sess.), § I.62;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 41c;

2013, No. 79

, § 26, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 45, eff. May 20, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 98a;

2017, No. 85

, § E.306.1.

§ 1998a.
Pharmacy mail order.

The Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program shall require consumers to purchase prescription drugs using mail order for selected pharmacy products.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 71

, § 307.

§ 1999.
Consumer protection rules; prior authorization.

The Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program shall authorize pharmacy benefit coverage when a patient’s health care provider prescribes a prescription drug not on the preferred drug list, or a prescription drug that is not the list’s preferred choice, if any of the circumstances set forth in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection applies.
(a) (1) The Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program shall authorize pharmacy benefit coverage when a patient’s health care provider prescribes a prescription drug not on the preferred drug list, or a prescription drug that is not the list’s preferred choice, if any of the circumstances set forth in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection applies.

The Program shall authorize coverage under the same terms as coverage for preferred choice drugs if the prescriber determines, after consultation with the pharmacist, or with the participating health benefit plan if required by the terms of the plan, that one or more of the following circumstances apply:
(2) (A) The Program shall authorize coverage under the same terms as coverage for preferred choice drugs if the prescriber determines, after consultation with the pharmacist, or with the participating health benefit plan if required by the terms of the plan, that one or more of the following circumstances apply:

The preferred choice or choices have not been effective, or with reasonable certainty are not expected to be effective, in treating the patient’s condition.

The preferred choice or choices cause or are reasonably expected to cause adverse or harmful reactions in the patient.

The patient is new to the Program and has been stabilized on a prescription drug that is not on the preferred drug list or is not one of the list’s preferred choices, or a current patient has been stabilized on a prescription drug that has been removed from preferred drug list or is no longer one of the list’s preferred choices, and it is clinically indicated that the patient should remain stabilized on the drug in order to avoid an adverse clinical impact or outcome.

(II)

The Drug Utilization Review Board and the Department of Vermont Health Access shall clinically evaluate newly introduced medications and therapeutic classes to determine their clinical appropriateness for continuation of coverage as set forth in subdivision (I) of this subdivision (iii).

The prescriber’s determination concerning whether the standards established in this subdivision (2) have been demonstrated shall be final if any documentation required at the direction of the Drug Utilization Review Board has been provided.

The Program shall authorize coverage if the patient agrees to pay any additional cost in excess of the benefits provided by the patient’s health benefit plan that is participating in the Program. The provisions of this subdivision (3) shall not apply to the extent that they may be inconsistent with any federal Medicaid laws and regulations. The provisions of this subdivision (3) shall not affect implementation by a participating health benefit plan of tiered copayments or other similar cost sharing systems.

The Program or any participating health benefit plan shall provide information on how prescribers, pharmacists, beneficiaries, and other interested parties can obtain a copy of the preferred drug list, whether any change has been made to the preferred drug list since it was last issued, and the process by which exceptions to the preferred list may be made.

, (d)[Repealed.]

(e) (1)

The prior authorization process shall be designed to minimize administrative burdens on prescribers, pharmacists, and consumers. The provisions of this section shall apply to the Program’s prior authorization process.

(2)

The prior authorization process shall ensure real-time receipt of requests, by telephone, voicemail, facsimile, electronic transmission, or mail on a 24-hour basis, seven days a week.

(3)

The prior authorization process shall provide an in-person response to emergency requests by a prescriber with telephone answering queues that do not exceed 10 minutes.

(4)

Any request for authorization or approval of a drug that the prescriber indicates, including the clinical reasons for the request, is for an emergency or urgent condition shall be responded to in no more than four hours from the time the Program or participating health benefit plan receives the request.

(5)

In emergency circumstances, or if the response to a request for prior authorization is not provided within the time period established in subdivision (4) of this subsection, a 72-hour supply of the drug prescribed shall be deemed to be authorized by the Program or the participating health benefit plan, provided it is a prescription drug approved by the Food and Drug Administration, and provided, for drugs dispensed to a Medicaid beneficiary, it is subject to a rebate agreement with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(6)

The Program or participating plan shall provide to participating providers a prior authorization request form for each enrolled beneficiary, known to be a patient of the provider, designed to permit the prescriber to make prior authorization requests in advance of the need to fill the prescription, and designed to be completed without unnecessary delay. The form shall be capable of being stamped with information relating to the participating provider, and if feasible at least one form capable of being copied shall contain known patient information.

(f)

The Program’s prior authorization process shall require that the prescriber, not the pharmacy, request a prior authorization exemption to the requirements of this section. No later than December 31, 2004, the Commissioner shall create a pilot program designed to exempt a prescriber from the prior authorization requirement of the preferred drug list program if the Program determines that the prescriber has met compliance standards established by the Department in consultation with the Drug Utilization Review Board. This exemption does not apply to drugs that require prior authorization for clinical reasons.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 128k;

2005, No. 71

, §§ 309, 310;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 41c;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 46, eff. May 20, 2014;

2019, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § E.307, eff. Oct. 2, 2020.

§ 2000.
Pharmacy benefit management.

The Commissioner may implement all or a portion of the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program through a contract with a third party with expertise in the management of pharmacy benefits.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 102;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.63.

§ 2001.
Legislative oversight.

In connection with the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program, the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall report for review by the House Committees on Appropriations, on Health Care, and on Human Services and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare prior to any modifications:

the compilation that constitutes the preferred drug list or list of drugs subject to prior authorization or any other utilization review procedures;

any utilization review procedures, including any prior authorization procedures; and

the procedures by which drugs will be identified as preferred on the preferred drug list, and the procedures by which drugs will be selected for prior authorization or any other utilization review procedure.

The Committees shall closely monitor implementation of the preferred drug list and utilization review procedures to ensure that the consumer protection standards enacted pursuant to section 1999 of this title are not diminished as a result of implementing the preferred drug list and the utilization review procedures, including any unnecessary delay in access to appropriate medications. The Committees shall ensure that all affected interests, including consumers, health care providers, pharmacists, and others with pharmaceutical expertise have an opportunity to comment on the preferred drug list and procedures reviewed under this subsection.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall report annually on or before October 30 to the House Committees on Appropriations, on Health Care, and on Human Services and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare concerning the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program. Topics covered in the report shall include issues related to drug cost and utilization; the effect of national trends on the pharmacy program; comparisons to other states; and decisions made by the Department’s Drug Utilization Review Board in relation to both drug utilization review efforts and the placement of drugs on the Department’s preferred drug list.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]
(e) (1) [Repealed.]

The Commissioner shall not enter into a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager unless the pharmacy benefit manager has agreed to disclose to the Commissioner the terms and the financial impact on Vermont and on Vermont beneficiaries of:

any agreement with a pharmaceutical manufacturer to favor the manufacturer’s products over a competitor’s products, or to place the manufacturer’s drug on the pharmacy benefit manager’s preferred list or formulary, or to switch the drug prescribed by the patient’s health care provider with a drug agreed to by the pharmacy benefit manager and the manufacturer;

any agreement with a pharmaceutical manufacturer to share manufacturer rebates and discounts with the pharmacy benefit manager, or to pay “soft money” or other economic benefits to the pharmacy benefit manager;

any agreement or practice to bill Vermont health benefit plans for prescription drugs at a cost higher than the pharmacy benefit manager pays the pharmacy;

any agreement to share revenue with a mail order or Internet pharmacy company;

any agreement to sell prescription drug data concerning Vermont beneficiaries or data concerning the prescribing practices of the health care providers of Vermont beneficiaries; or

any other agreement of the pharmacy benefit manager with a pharmaceutical manufacturer, or with wholesale and retail pharmacies, affecting the cost of pharmacy benefits provided to Vermont beneficiaries.

The Commissioner shall not enter into a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager who has entered into an agreement or engaged in a practice described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, unless the Commissioner determines that the agreement or practice furthers the financial interests of Vermont and does not adversely affect the medical interests of Vermont beneficiaries.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 103;

2009, No. 33

, § 83;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.64;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 41c;

2015, No. 23

, § 57;

2015, No. 58

, § E.307.1;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 68;

2015, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § E.306.10.

§ 2002.
Supplemental rebates.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access, separately or in concert with the authorized representatives of any participating health benefit plan, shall use the preferred drug list authorized by the Pharmacy Best Practices and Cost Control Program to negotiate with pharmaceutical companies for the payment to the Commissioner of supplemental rebates or price discounts for Medicaid and for any other State public assistance health benefit plans designated by the Commissioner, in addition to those required by Title XIX of the Social Security Act. The Commissioner may also use the preferred drug list to negotiate for the payment of rebates or price discounts in connection with drugs covered under any other participating health benefit plan within or outside this State, provided that such negotiations and any subsequent agreement shall comply with the provisions of

42 U.S.C. § 1396r

-8. The Program, or such portions of the Program as the Commissioner shall designate, shall constitute a State pharmaceutical assistance program under

42 U.S.C. § 1396r

-8(c)(1)(C).

The Commissioner shall negotiate supplemental rebates, price discounts, and other mechanisms to reduce net prescription drug costs by means of any negotiation strategy that the Commissioner determines will result in the maximum economic benefit to the Program and to consumers in this State, while maintaining access to high-quality prescription drug therapies. The Commissioner may negotiate through a purchasing pool or directly with manufacturers. The provisions of this subsection do not authorize agreements with pharmaceutical manufacturers in which financial support for medical services covered by the Medicaid program is accepted as consideration for placement of one or more prescription drugs on the preferred drug list.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall prohibit the public disclosure of information revealing company-identifiable trade secrets (including rebate and supplemental rebate amounts, and manufacturer’s pricing) obtained by the Department, and by any officer, employee, or contractor of the Department in the course of negotiations conducted pursuant to this section. Such confidential information shall be exempt from public disclosure under 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 (Public Records Act).

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2005, No. 71

, § 311;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 104;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.65;

2021, No. 20

, § 307.

§ 2003.
Pharmacy discount plans.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall implement pharmacy discount plans, to be known as the Healthy Vermonters Program, for Vermonters without adequate coverage for prescription drugs. The provisions of subchapter 8 of this chapter shall apply to the Commissioner’s authority to administer the pharmacy discount plans established by this section.

The Healthy Vermonters Program shall offer beneficiaries an initial discounted cost for covered drugs. Upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of a Section 1115 Medicaid waiver program, and upon subsequent legislative approval, the Healthy Vermonters Program shall offer beneficiaries a secondary discounted cost, which shall reflect a State payment toward the cost of each dispensed drug as well as any rebate amount negotiated by the Commissioner.

As used in this section:

“Beneficiary” means any individual enrolled in the Healthy Vermonters Program.

“Healthy Vermonters beneficiary” means any individual Vermont resident without adequate coverage:

who is at least 65 years of age, or is disabled and is eligible for Medicare or Social Security disability benefits, with household income equal to or less than 400 percent of the federal poverty level, as calculated using modified adjusted gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 36B(d)(2)(B); or

whose household income is equal to or less than 350 percent of the federal poverty level, as calculated using modified adjusted gross income as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 36B(d)(2)(B).

[Repealed.]

“Initial discounted cost” means the price of the drug based on the Medicaid fee schedule.

“Labeler” means an entity or person that receives prescription drugs from a manufacturer or wholesaler and repackages those drugs for later retail sale and that has a labeler code from the federal Food and Drug Administration under 21 C.F.R. § 207.20.

“Participating retail pharmacy” means a retail pharmacy located in this State or another business licensed to dispense prescription drugs in this State that participates in the Program according to rules established by the Department and provides discounted prices to eligible beneficiaries of the Program.

“Rebate amount” means the rebate negotiated by the Director and required from a drug manufacturer or labeler under this section. In determining the appropriate rebate, the Director shall:

take into consideration the rebate calculated under the Medicaid rebate program under

42 U.S.C. § 1396r

-8, the average wholesale price of prescription drugs, and any other information on prescription drug prices and price discounts;

use his or her best efforts to obtain an initial rebate amount equal to or greater than the rebate calculated under the Medicaid program under

42 U.S.C. § 1396r

-8; and

use his or her best efforts to obtain an amount equal to or greater than the amount of any discount, rebate, or price reduction for prescription drugs provided to the federal government.

“Secondary discounted cost” means, under the Healthy Vermonters Program, the price of the drug based on the Medicaid fee schedule, less payment by the State of at least two percent of the Medicaid rate, less any rebate amount negotiated by the Director and paid for out of the Healthy Vermonters Dedicated Fund established under subsection (h) of this section and, under the Healthy Vermonters Plus Program, the average wholesale price of the drug, less payment by the State of at least two percent of the Medicaid rate, less any rebate amount negotiated by the Director and paid for out of the Healthy Vermonters Dedicated Fund established under subsection (h) of this section.

“Without adequate coverage” includes beneficiaries with no coverage for prescription drugs or certain types of prescription drugs and beneficiaries whose annual maximum coverage limit under their health benefit plan has been reached.

Drugs covered by the pharmacy discount plans shall include all drugs covered under the Medicaid program.

The Vermont Board of Pharmacy shall adopt standards of practice requiring disclosure by participating retail pharmacies to beneficiaries of the amount of savings provided as a result of the pharmacy discount plans. The standards must consider and protect information that is proprietary in nature. The Department of Vermont Health Access may not impose transaction charges under this Program on pharmacies that submit claims or receive payments under the plans. Pharmacies shall submit claims to the Department to verify the amount charged to beneficiaries under the plans. On a weekly or biweekly basis, the Department must reimburse pharmacies for the difference between the initial discounted price or the average wholesale price and the secondary discounted price provided to beneficiaries.

The names of drug manufacturers and labelers who do and do not enter into rebate agreements under pharmacy discount plans are public information. The Department of Vermont Health Access shall release this information to health care providers and the public on a regular basis and shall publicize participation by manufacturers and labelers. The Department shall impose prior authorization requirements in the Medicaid program, as permitted by law, to the extent the Department determines it is appropriate to do so in order to encourage manufacturer and labeler participation in the pharmacy discount plans and so long as the additional prior authorization requirements remain consistent with the goals of the Medicaid program and the requirements of Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

The Commissioner of Vermont Health Access shall establish, by rule, a process to resolve discrepancies in rebate amounts claimed by manufacturers, labelers, pharmacies, and the Department.

The Healthy Vermonters Dedicated Fund is established to receive revenue from manufacturers and labelers who pay rebates as provided in this section and any appropriations or allocations designated for the Fund. The purposes of the Fund are to reimburse retail pharmacies for discounted prices provided to individuals enrolled in the pharmacy discount plans and to reimburse the Department of Vermont Health Access for contracted services, including pharmacy claims processing fees, administrative and associated computer costs, and other reasonable program costs. The Fund is a nonlapsing dedicated fund. Interest on Fund balances accrues to the Fund. Surplus funds in the Fund must be used for the benefit of the Program.

[Repealed.]

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall undertake outreach efforts to build public awareness of the pharmacy discount plans and maximize enrollment. Outreach efforts shall include steps to educate retail pharmacists on the purposes of the Healthy Vermonters Dedicated Fund, in particular as it relates to pharmacy reimbursements for discounted prices provided to Program enrollees. The Department may adjust the requirements and terms of the pharmacy discount plans to accommodate any new federally funded prescription drug programs.

The Department of Vermont Health Access may contract with a third party or third parties to administer any or all components of the pharmacy discount plans, including outreach, eligibility, claims, administration, and rebate recovery and redistribution.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall administer the pharmacy discount plans and other medical and pharmaceutical assistance programs under this title in a manner advantageous to the programs and enrollees. In implementing this section, the Department may coordinate the other programs and the pharmacy discount plans and may take actions to enhance efficiency, reduce the cost of prescription drugs, and maximize benefits to the programs and enrollees, including providing the benefits of pharmacy discount plans to enrollees in other programs.

The Department of Vermont Health Access may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall seek a waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) requesting authorization necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including application of manufacturer and labeler rebates to the pharmacy discount plans. The secondary discounted cost shall not be available to beneficiaries of the pharmacy discount plans until the Department receives written notification from CMS that the waiver requested under this section has been approved and until the General Assembly subsequently approves all aspects of the pharmacy discount plans, including funding for positions and related operating costs associated with eligibility determinations.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 128o;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 105;

2007, No. 80

, § 7;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.66;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 41c;

2013, No. 79

, § 31, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. May 20, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 99.

§ 2004.
Manufacturer fee.

Annually, each pharmaceutical manufacturer or labeler of prescription drugs that are paid for by the Department of Vermont Health Access for individuals participating in Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, or VPharm shall pay a fee to the Agency of Human Services. The fee shall be 1.75 percent of the previous calendar year’s prescription drug spending by the Department and shall be assessed based on manufacturer labeler codes as used in the Medicaid rebate program.

Fees collected under this section shall fund collection and analysis of information on pharmaceutical marketing activities under

18 V.S.A. §§ 4632

and 4633; analysis of prescription drug data needed by the Office of the Attorney General for enforcement activities; the Vermont Prescription Monitoring System established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 84A; the evidence-based education program established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 91, subchapter 2; statewide unused prescription drug disposal initiatives; prevention of prescription drug misuse, abuse, and diversion; the Substance Misuse Prevention Oversight and Advisory Council established in

18 V.S.A. § 4803

; treatment of substance use disorder; exploration of nonpharmacological approaches to pain management; a hospital antimicrobial program for the purpose of reducing hospital-acquired infections; the purchase and distribution of fentanyl testing strips; the purchase and distribution of naloxone to emergency medical services personnel; and any opioid-antagonist education, training, and distribution program operated by the Department of Health or its agents. The fees shall be collected in the Evidence-Based Education and Advertising Fund established in section 2004a of this title.

The Secretary of Human Services or designee shall make rules for the implementation of this section.

The Department shall maintain on its website a list of the manufacturers who have failed to provide timely payment as required under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 80

, § 20; amended

2007, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.67;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.311;

2013, No. 50

, § E.312.1;

2013, No. 79

, § 27, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2013, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 84, eff. Feb. 25, 2014;

2015, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2019, No. 70

, § 29;

2019, No. 72

, § E.313.